North Carolina statutes. Chapter 81A. Weights and Measures Act of 1975.
Article 4. Uniform Weights and Measures.

§§ 81A-37 through 81A-40.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 607, s. 2.

§ 81A-41.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-44, s. 1.

§ 81A-42.
Standard weights and measures.

Whenever any commodity named in this section shall be quoted or sold by the bushel, the bushel shall be the number of pounds stated in this section and whenever quoted or sold in subdivisions of the bushel, the number of pounds shall be the fractional part of the number of pounds as set forth herein for the bushel, and when sold by the barrel shall consist of the number of pounds constituting 3.281 bushels.

tablenum=“=table32”>
=c1 Cabbage
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Canary seed
. . . . .
=c2 60 =c1 Carrots
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Cement
. . . . .
=c2 80 =c1 Charcoal
. . . . .
=c2 22 =c1 Cherries, with stems
. . . . .
=c2 56 =c1 Cherries, without stems
. . . . .
=c2 64 =c1 Clover seed, red and white
. . . . .
=c2 60 =c1 Clover, Burr
. . . . .
=c2 8 =c1 Clover, German
. . . . .
=c2 60 =c1 Clover, Japan, Lespedeza
. . . . .
=c2 25 =c1 Coal, stone
. . . . .
=c2 80 =c1 Coke
. . . . .
=c2 40 =c1 Corn, shelled
. . . . .
=c2 56 =c1 Corn, Kaffir
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Corn, pop
. . . . .
=c2 70 =c1 Cotton seed
. . . . .
=c2 30 =c1 Cotton seed, Sea Island
. . . . .
=c2 44 =c1 Cucumbers
. . . . .
=c2 48 =c1 Fish
. . . . .
=c2 100 =c1 Flax seed
. . . . .
=c2 56 =c1 Grapes, with stems
. . . . .
=c2 48 =c1 Grapes, without stems
. . . . .
=c2 60 =c1 Gooseberries
. . . . .
=c2 48 =c1 Grass seed, Bermuda
. . . . .
=c2 14 =c1 Grass seed, blue
. . . . .
=c2 14 =c1 Grass seed, Hungarian
. . . . .
=c2 48 =c1 Grass seed, Johnson
. . . . .
=c2 25 =c1 Grass seed, Italian rye
. . . . .
=c2 20 =c1 Grass seed, orchard
. . . . .
=c2 14 =c1 Grass seed, tall meadow and fescue
. . . . .
=c2 24 =c1 Grass seed, all meadow and fescue except tall
. . . . .
=c2 14 =c1 Grass seed, perennial rye
. . . . .
=c2 14 =c1 Grass seed, timothy
. . . . .
=c2 45 =c1 Grass [seed], redtop
. . . . .
=c2 14 =c1 Grass seed, velvet
. . . . .
=c2 7 =c1 Hair, plaster
. . . . .
=c2 8 =c1 Hemp seed
. . . . .
=c2 44 =c1 Hominy
. . . . .
=c2 62 =c1 Horseradish
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Land plaster
. . . . .
=c2 100 =c1 Lime, unslaked
. . . . .
=c2 80 =c1 Lime, slaked
. . . . .
=c2 40 =c1 Meal, corn, whether bolted or unbolted
. . . . .
=c2 48 =c1 Melon, cantaloupe
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Millet
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Mustard
. . . . .
=c2 58 =c1 Nuts, chestnuts
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Nuts, hickory, without hulls
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Nuts, walnut, without hulls
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Oats, seed
. . . . .
=c2 32 =c1 Onions, button sets
. . . . .
=c2 32 =c1 Onions, top buttons
. . . . .
=c2 28 =c1 Onions, matured
. . . . .
=c2 57 =c1 Osage orange seed
. . . . .
=c2 33 =c1 Parsnips
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Peaches, matured
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Peaches, dried
. . . . .
=c2 25 =c1 Peach seed
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Peanuts, Spanish
. . . . .
=c2 30 =c1 Peanuts
. . . . .
=c2 22 =c1 Pears, matured
. . . . .
=c2 56 =c1 Pears, dried
. . . . .
=c2 26 =c1 Peas, dried field
. . . . .
=c2 60 =c1 Peas, green in hull field
. . . . .
=c2 30 =c1 Pieplant
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Plums
. . . . .
=c2 64 =c1 Pork net (per bbl.)
. . . . .
=c2 200 =c1 Potatoes, Irish
. . . . .
=c2 56 =c1 Potatoes, sweet green
. . . . .
=c2 56 =c1 Potatoes, sweet, dry weight =c2 47 =c1 Quinces, matured
. . . . .
=c2 48 =c1 Raspberries
. . . . .
=c2 48 =c1 Rice, rough
. . . . .
=c2 44 =c1 Rye seed
. . . . .
=c2 56 =c1 Sage
. . . . .
=c2 4 =c1 Salads, mustard, spinach, turnips, and kale
. . . . .
=c2 10 =c1 Salt
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Sorghum molasses (per gal.)
. . . . .
=c2 12 =c1 Sorghum seed
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Strawberries
. . . . .
=c2 48 =c1 Sunflower seed
. . . . .
=c2 24 =c1 Teosinte
. . . . .
=c2 59 =c1 Tomatoes
. . . . .
=c2 56 =c1 Turnips
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Wheat
. . . . .
=c2 60 =te
=c1 Hair, plaster
. . . . .
=c2 8 =c1 Hemp seed
. . . . .
=c2 44 =c1 Hominy
. . . . .
=c2 62 =c1 Horseradish
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Land plaster
. . . . .
=c2 100 =c1 Lime, unslaked
. . . . .
=c2 80 =c1 Lime, slaked
. . . . .
=c2 40 =c1 Meal, corn, whether bolted or unbolted
. . . . .
=c2 48 =c1 Melon, cantaloupe
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Millet
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Mustard
. . . . .
=c2 58 =c1 Nuts, chestnuts
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Nuts, hickory, without hulls
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Nuts, walnut, without hulls
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Oats, seed
. . . . .
=c2 32 =c1 Onions, button sets
. . . . .
=c2 32 =c1 Onions, top buttons
. . . . .
=c2 28 =c1 Onions, matured
. . . . .
=c2 57 =c1 Osage orange seed
. . . . .
=c2 33 =c1 Parsnips
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Peaches, matured
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Peaches, dried
. . . . .
=c2 25 =c1 Peach seed
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Peanuts, Spanish
. . . . .
=c2 30 =c1 Peanuts
. . . . .
=c2 22 =c1 Pears, matured
. . . . .
=c2 56 =c1 Pears, dried
. . . . .
=c2 26 =c1 Peas, dried field
. . . . .
=c2 60 =c1 Peas, green in hull field
. . . . .
=c2 30 =c1 Pieplant
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Plums
. . . . .
=c2 64 =c1 Pork net (per bbl.)
. . . . .
=c2 200 =c1 Potatoes, Irish
. . . . .
=c2 56 =c1 Potatoes, sweet green
. . . . .
=c2 56 =c1 Potatoes, sweet, dry weight =c2 47 =c1 Quinces, matured
. . . . .
=c2 48 =c1 Raspberries
. . . . .
=c2 48 =c1 Rice, rough
. . . . .
=c2 44 =c1 Rye seed
. . . . .
=c2 56 =c1 Sage
. . . . .
=c2 4 =c1 Salads, mustard, spinach, turnips, and kale
. . . . .
=c2 10 =c1 Salt
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Sorghum molasses (per gal.)
. . . . .
=c2 12 =c1 Sorghum seed
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Strawberries
. . . . .
=c2 48 =c1 Sunflower seed
. . . . .
=c2 24 =c1 Teosinte
. . . . .
=c2 59 =c1 Tomatoes
. . . . .
=c2 56 =c1 Turnips
. . . . .
=c2 50 =c1 Wheat
. . . . .
=c2 60 =te

It shall be unlawful to purchase or sell, or barter or exchange, any article named in this section on any other basis than as stated herein; provided, however, that any such articles may be sold by weight.

History.

Code, ss. 3849, 3850; 1885, c. 26; 1905, c. 126; Rev., s. 3066; 1909, c. 555, s. 1; c. 835; 1915, c. 230, s. 1; 1917, c. 34; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 87; 1931, c. 76; 1933, c. 523, s. 3; 1937, c. 354; 1949, c. 984; 1975, c. 544.

§ 81A-43.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 607, s. 2.

§ 81A-44.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-44, s. 2.

§§ 81A-45 through 81A-49.

Reserved for future codification purposes.